src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-mwtkwz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - mõtkõz: # Noun 179 'eng /est mõte/fin' - full paradigm
     mõtkõz+N+Sg+Nom: mõtkõz
     mõtkõz+N+Sg+Gen: mõtkõ
     mõtkõz+N+Sg+Par: mõtkõzt
     mõtkõz+N+Sg+Dat: mõtkõn
     mõtkõz+N+Sg+Ins: mõtkõks
     mõtkõz+N+Sg+Ill: [mõtkõ, mõtkõz]
     mõtkõz+N+Sg+Ela: mõtkõst
     mõtkõz+N+Pl+Nom: mõtkõd
     mõtkõz+N+Pl+Gen: mõtkõd
     mõtkõz+N+Pl+Par: mõtkidi
     mõtkõz+N+Pl+Dat: mõtkõdõn
     mõtkõz+N+Pl+Ins: mõtkõdõks
     mõtkõz+N+Pl+Ill: mõtkiž
     mõtkõz+N+Pl+Ela: mõtkist
